Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 20. Amendments

§ 1. How amendments proposed by legislature and submitted to people.

Any amendment or amendments to this constitution may be proposed in either branch of the legislature, and, if the same shall be agreed to by two-thirds of all the members of each of the two houses, voting separately, such proposed amendment or amendments shall, with the yeas and nays thereon, be entered on their journals, and it shall be the duty of the legislature to submit such amendment or amendments to the electors of the state at the next general election, and cause the same to be published without delay for at least twelve (12) consecutive weeks, prior to said election, in at least one newspaper of general circulation, published in each county, and if a majority of the electors shall ratify the same, such amendment or amendments shall become a part of this constitution.

Cross references. —

As to the effective date of a constitutional amendment originating with the legislature and ratified by the electorate, see §

22-20-108

.

Legislative measures must be presented to governor. —

When art. 3, § 41 and art. 20, § 1, Wyo. Const., are read together, it is plainly declared that legislative measures, however denominated, which propose an amendment to the constitution, must be presented to the governor for approval or disapproval; thus, a measure proposing an amendment to the constitution must be presented to the governor for approval or disapproval. Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

Meaning of “electors.” —

Word “electors” as used in this section is taken to mean those persons actually voting at the general election. School Dist. v. Cook, 424 P.2d 751,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1967).

The word “electors” in this section means the number of electors who actually voted in the election. State ex rel. White v. Hathaway, 478 P.2d 56,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1970).

“Electors” in this section should not mean a person entitled to vote at an election, since until a person qualified to exercise the privilege of voting actually takes advantage of his franchise, he does not become an elector. State ex rel. White v. Hathaway, 478 P.2d 56,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1970).

Majority required by section. —

This section, requiring “a majority of the electors” to ratify an amendment to the constitution, requires a majority of the electors to adopt an amendment, and not merely a majority of those actually voting thereon. State ex rel. Blair v. Brooks, 17 Wyo. 344, 99 P. 874,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1909).

This section requires a majority of the electors voting in the election to adopt an amendment, and not merely a majority of those voting thereon. State ex rel. White v. Hathaway, 478 P.2d 56,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1970).

Quoted

in

Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Jan 28, 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. How two or more amendments voted on.

If two or more amendments are proposed, they shall be submitted in such manner that the electors shall vote for or against each of them separately.

§ 3. Constitutional convention.

Whenever two-thirds of the members elected to each branch of the legislature shall deem it necessary to call a convention to revise or amend this constitution, they shall recommend to the electors to vote at the next general election for or against a convention, and if a majority of all the electors voting at such election shall have voted for a convention, the legislature shall at the next session provide by law for calling the same; and such convention shall consist of a number of members, not less than double that of the most numerous branch of the legislature.

Cited

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 4. Constitution adopted by convention to be submitted to people.

Any constitution adopted by such convention shall have no validity until it has been submitted to and adopted by the people.

Cross references. —

As to amendments to constitution of Wyoming, see §§

22-20-101

to

22-20-109

.

As to amendments to constitution of United States, see §§

22-20-201

through

22-20-209

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).